Hawaii statutes.
§465-11 Renewals; continuing education
requirement. (a) Every license issued under this chapter shall be renewed
biennially on or before June 30 of each even-numbered year. Failure to renew a
license shall result in forfeiture of the license; provided that a psychologist
whose license has been forfeited for one year or less for failure to renew may restore
the license by payment of the renewal fee and, in the case of a psychologist
who is audited, pursuant to subsection (g), submission of documentation of
continuing education compliance, for the biennium in which the failure
occurred. If licensing has lapsed for more than one year, the person may
reapply for a license in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(b) A psychologist in good standing who will
not be practicing in the State for at least one year may petition the board to
have the psychologist's license placed on inactive status without penalty.
When the psychologist wishes to return to practice, an application shall be
made to the board for reactivation upon payment of the license fee for the
biennial period and subject to the board's review of the application as
provided in its rules.

(c) Beginning with the July 1, 2016, through
June 30, 2018, biennium period and prior to every biennial renewal thereafter,
each licensee shall:

(1) Pay all required fees; and

(2) Complete a minimum of eighteen credit hours of
continuing education within every licensing biennium.

(d) First-time licensees shall not be subject
to the continuing education requirement established under subsection (c)(2) for
the first license renewal.

(e) Each licensee shall be responsible for
maintaining the licensee's continuing education records. At the time of
renewal, each licensee shall certify under oath that the licensee has complied
with the continuing education requirement of this section. The board may
require a licensee to submit evidence satisfactory to the board that
demonstrates compliance with the continuing education requirement.

(f) Any licensee seeking renewal of a license
without full compliance with the continuing education requirement shall submit
with the renewal application the required fee, a notarized affidavit setting
forth the facts explaining the reasons for noncompliance, and a request for an
extension on the basis of the facts; provided that the licensee shall complete
at least thirty-six hours of continuing education for the next licensing
biennium. The board shall consider each case on an individual basis and may
grant an extension based on:

(1) Practice in an isolated geographical area with an
absence of opportunities for continuing education by taped programs or
otherwise; or

(2) Inability to devote sufficient hours to
continuing education because of incapacity, undue hardship, or any other
serious extenuating circumstances.

(g) The board may conduct random audits of
licensees to determine compliance with the continuing education requirement.
The board shall provide written notice of an audit to a licensee randomly
selected for audit. Within sixty days of notification, the licensee shall
provide the board with documentation verifying compliance with the continuing
education requirement established by this section. [L 1967, c 290, pt of §1;
HRS §465-11; am L 1975, c 118, §29(2); am L 1983, c 95, §5; am L 1987, c 72, §4;
am L 2014, c 187, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next